csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAIO_Imp_VAIO.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     adaawen+VAIO+Imp+NA+Sim+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawen
     adaawen+VAIO+Imp+NA+Sim+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [adaaweg,adaawek]
     adaawen+VAIO+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+0Sg: adaawedaa
     adaawen+VAIO+Imp+NA+Sim+Incl+0Pl: adaawedaanin
     adaawen+VAIO+Imp+NA+Prb+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaaweken
     adaawen+VAIO+Imp+NA+Prb+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawekegon
     adaawen+VAIO+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+0Sg: adaawesiidaa
     adaawen+VAIO+Imp+NA+Prb+Incl+0Pl: adaawesiidaanin
     adaawen+VAIO+Imp+NA+Del+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: adaawekan
     adaawen+VAIO+Imp+NA+Del+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawekeg
     adaawen+VAIO+Imp+NA+Del+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: adaawekang
